Section 1: NEW Week 1 - Build Your First LLM Product: Exploring Top Models:

001. Day 1 - Running Your First LLM Locally with Ollama and Open Source Models (11min)

Transcript:
This is an important moment.
This is the beginning of an eight week adventure that you are not going to believe.
Whether you are completely new to programming, or whether you're an experienced engineer, or whether
you've already taken this course and you've seen I've updated it and you've come back to get the latest.
I have something big in store for everybody.
Let's dive in.
My name is Editor Donna.
I am the co-founder and CTO of AI startup Nebula.
And before we get started, it's customary in these things to walk you through what we're going to get
done over the next eight weeks the objectives, the structure, the projects, and how we will position
ourselves for success.
Except we won't.
I'm lying.
That's that's not my jam.
People that have done my courses before know that I like to start with action.
Let's get right to it.
In the first couple of minutes of this course, let's go and experiment with LMS, which is what it's
all about, and there'll be plenty of time to come back later and do that other stuff.
So first things first, I want you to bring up a fresh browser window, your favorite browser, whatever
it might be, and I want you to go to this website.
It is github.com.
Engineering, which is the repo for this course.
And it's also linked in the course resources.
It should be easy to find this is the repo.
We're not going to do anything with it yet.
I bring it up because if you scroll down on this first page, you get to see what's known as the Readme
for the course.
And the Readme has everything you need to know.
It's got links to other things, it's got links to my LinkedIn, which I'm going to go on and on about.
It's got links to setup instructions.
It also might look a bit different to what you see here, because I'm constantly updating the Readme
to have the very latest information there.
And the first thing we're going to be doing is we're going to be following this instant gratification
section here.
And you should always look first and foremost at the documentation because that will be super up to
date.
So take a look through that and then we're going to get started with our first exploration of LMS.
So I'm guessing that you, like most of the people on the planet, are familiar with ChatGPT, and you
have interacted with an LLM over ChatGPT, and perhaps also Claude and Gemini and others.
And what we're about to do now is also interact with another AI, an LLM.
But we're going to be doing it running on our computer.
We're going to take an open source LLM built by someone else, and we're going to install it on our
machines and interact with it there.
And that's somehow a much more exciting proposition to be actually interacting with an AI that you are
running yourself rather than on the cloud.
And we're going to use this fabulous product called Olama to do it.
And let's go and do that right now.
And as a reminder, you'll be able to follow all of these instructions in the Readme in a section.
That's called instant gratification.
But I'm going to start by going to olama.
It's spelled O and it's linked in the readme.
And this is what it looks like.
And you can do the same thing basically on a PC or on a mac or on Linux.
It's going to work the same way on all three, which is fabulous.
So Olama, which is named as sort of an homage to one of the first open source models called llama from
meta O llama is a product which runs on your computer, which can run a model and can run it in a very
fast, packaged, efficient way locally so that you can interact with it.
And the first thing you're going to do is come here, you're going to go to the download button here,
press download.
Choose the system that you've got.
Press download for your system.
It will start to download in the usual way.
And then once it's downloaded, you will open that up by clicking on it here and up it will come.
If you're on a mac, you drag it from here into applications and it appears there.
If you're on a PC, you also just install it the usual way.
And then once you've done that, you launch it from your applications folder or from from its icon or
from the start menu launch alarm.
So it opens up in its own screen.
And when you do that, a screen like this should pop up.
It's on llamas user interface with a little chat UI, but we're not going to use it.
You're now going to press the X button, the close button to to get rid of it, because we're going
to interact directly with llama on our computer, and we're going to do it using something called a
command prompt.
So there's a different way to do this on a PC and a mac.
And it's super simple and the instructions are in the Readme.
You might be familiar with this.
If you're on a mac, you go to applications and utilities and you double click on terminal.
If you're on a PC, you go to the start menu and you type out PowerShell to open up a PowerShell.
If you're on Linux, you know exactly what to do.
But either way, follow the instructions to bring up a command line and then we will start talking to
an LLM.
And this is what I see.
And you should see something pretty similar.
This is on a mac.
On a PC you would see the word PowerShell, but it's the same kind of thing.
And the first thing I want you to do is type Olama.
And you should see a sort of help screen with things you can do with Olama.
If you don't see that, check out the readme.
The other thing you can do just to check it should already be running.
If you type Olama serve, which is the way to start it, it should complain address already in use which
is telling you it's already running.
It's good.
When we double clicked on it, we started it running.
And if it if it tells you that it's that it started then then that's that's great too.
Okay.
So we have Olama and we have Olama running.
So next we're actually going to run Olama.
We're going to get it to download a model from the internet and run it on our computer.
And you do that with a simple command Olama run.
And then the name of the model that you want it to download.
And we're going to pick a model made by Google that is called GEMA.
It is the small cousin of Gemini, the flagship model, but GEMA is the one that they made freely available
to everybody.
So we type out GEMA, it's about GE.
We're going to use Gemma three, which is the latest version, and then put a colon and after the colon
you can choose what size you want.
And we're going to choose a really small size 2.70 M, which means 270 million of these things called
parameters that we'll talk a lot about in the future.
And that that might sound quite big.
270 million of anything sounds pretty big, but most of most of the time these these things are measured
in the billions.
So 270 million is in fact really, really tiny.
And when I press enter it now downloads Gemma.
Now this might take a couple of seconds for you.
It's already downloaded for me.
So it was there.
It could take a couple of minutes.
If you've got a slower internet connection, it should be pretty fast.
And then once it's done, you will have a cursor like this.
That means that you are ready to interact with this model running on your computer.
So we should keep expectations low.
It's a very small model, but still.
Let's begin.
I'm going to say hi there.
My first message to an AI on my computer and it says hi there, how can I help you today?
I'll say, my name is Ed and that's great, I'm Ed.
Haha no, that's my name.
That's perfect I'm Ed.
So look, this is a very small model and you shouldn't have high expectations with it.
What we're going to do now is pick a slightly bigger model and have hopefully a more robust conversation
with a larger model.
Let's give it a shot.
So now you should stop your conversation with Gemma.
And the way you do that in that command line is you press Ctrl D that exits your conversation with Gemma
Control.
For people on A on a mac, it's not the same as command.
Watch out for that Ctrl d.
All right.
And then let's go back to the website and you'll see that there's models in the main navigation here.
If you click on that it comes up with a list of all the different open source models that you can use
through Olama.
And there are many of them.
We were just playing with Gemma, three, and Gemma three.
You can see it also comes in lots of different sizes if you just do.
Gemma three you get this version here latest, which is 3.3GB.
It's quite big.
Uh, and there's also the one we were just using which is Gemma three 270 M which is much, much smaller.
And there's a whole slew of different sizes.
And you can try these out yourself if your computer is big enough to, to store them and then experiment
and see how a larger model is able to have a more robust conversation.
But for now, we're going to go to models, and I suggest that we pick from here.
Let's go with Phi three from Microsoft.
We're going to try Phi three latest.
If your machine is big enough to take this, if you have 2.2GB free on your drive, and if it's fast
enough then you'll see this two.
But I'm going to give Phi three a shot.
Let's see how it performs.
So here we go.
I type Olama Phi three.
And the first time this will take a few minutes to download onto your computer depending on your network
and the strength of your computer.
And the first thing I'm going to do is I'm going to say hi there.
Let's see how it performs.
Hello.
How can I assist you today?
Uh, tell me a fun fact.
Uh, there we go.
Here we go.
Did you know that the Eiffel Tower in Paris is not as stable on its legs as people might think?
Uh, slight parts of it to sway up to six feet.
How about that?
All right, tell me another.
Okay.
The world record for being able to eat the most hot dogs in an hour is held by Joey Chestnut.
That I did think I knew as a New Yorker.
This happens every year.
Uh, so there we go.
Some some interesting, fun facts.
Hopefully you've had different fun facts from FY three.
And if you're trying different models, you might get all sorts of different fun facts.
Um, so this is this is the FY three model.
And we're now going to try one more.
So I do control D to stop the conversation just like that.
And now I'm going to type Allama one.
And now I'm going to pick the biggest model that will run on my computer.
And this may not run on your computer, so.
So don't worry if you need to have at least 16MB of Ram on your computer for this to run, and something
like 20GB free on your drive.
There's no need to run this if you don't wish, but I want to show you what it's like to run the latest
model from OpenAI, which is called GPT OS, which is the open source version of OpenAI's GPT model.
So this is a big old model and it's going to download it for you.
And that might take a fair bit of time.
It's also going to really hammer my computer.
So there it is.
It is running.
We have GPT OS.
This is in fact the 20 billion parameter version.
So it's again many times bigger than Phi three, which is itself 16 times bigger than Gemma three 270
million.
So this is a big model.
We're running it locally.
Let's interact with it.

002. Day 1 - Spanish Tutor Demo with Open-Source Models & Course Overview (11min)

Transcript:
So I'm now running with this powerful model GPT, and hopefully you're either doing the same or you're
using a smaller model like Phi 3 or 1 of the gamma variants, or perhaps something from llama, which
is made by meta.
And I'm going to try and use this for a true purpose.
I'm going to say, um, hi.
Uh, I'm trying to learn Spanish.
I'm a total beginner.
Please have a conversation.
A con with me as my Spanish tutor.
All right.
Let's see how it does.
And this is the kind of thing that you might see in a commercial app like Duolingo.
First of all, notice that it starts by describing its thought process in this different color, in
this gray color here.
And then we get the final answer.
It says, Hola, soy espanol.
I forgive my horrible accent.
I assure you I am significantly better with Llms than I am with Spanish.
Uh, all right.
And you can see it says uh, yo or LA and it wants me to respond.
And so I could say, Hola.
Um, may I add, uh, uh, and then, uh, you could see that it says data.
So it will gradually take you through the process of having a beginner level conversation in Spanish.
And the great thing about this is that this is quite similar to the kind of functionality that you might
find in an app.
So I wanted to do this to show you that right off the bat, you can start getting actual value from
running an open source AI large language model locally on your computer.
Uh, even if you speak terrible Spanish like me.
And hopefully I'll get better over time.
Next time I record this, I'm gonna have a great accent.
Uh, so anyways, have fun with it.
Use this.
Try out different models.
Try exploring how the larger size models are able to be more intelligent in how they interact with you.
See these thinking type models?
We'll be talking a lot more about them in the coming days.
Get some exposure to this and enjoy the fact that you are harnessing the power of a large language model
locally on your computer.
Now, I'm hoping you've had a really enjoyable rabbit hole experience of trying out different models,
experimenting, and being enamored by the power of these things.
But I have to pull you back.
It is time now for us to talk about everything that I've got in store for you for the next eight weeks,
and this is a timeline that I'll be showing you frequently.
It's a timeline that shows you where you start over on the left, and the eight weeks that I have in
store for you.
Tomorrow I'm going to go through this in a lot more detail, but there's going to be this week, which
will be more foundational.
Next week is about frontier models.
The week after is about open source models.
Then it's about selecting the right model for the task at hand.
Then it will be about rag.
We'll go deep on rag, one of the hottest topics in AI.
Then we will fine tune a frontier model and then fine tune an open source model.
And finally, I will introduce a genetic AI in the final week of our eight week series.
And at that point, you'll be able to wave a flag and say, I am now an LLM engineer.
I have reached this milestone to mastery, and I've built a comprehensive curriculum for you throughout
the next eight weeks.
And one of the things I love about it is it really builds and builds and builds.
We start by covering a range of different models, different llms, open source and closed source.
Then we cover a lot of toolkits, libraries, frameworks that use those LMS things like hugging face
gradio for user interfaces, lang chain weights and biases, modal com, and then building on top of
that, we apply different techniques to getting the most performance out of LMS techniques like Rag,
fine tuning and agents.
But by far the best thing about this course is the building.
I'm a big believer in learning by doing.
I think the best way to learn is by building great commercial projects, and that we will do from multimodal
projects to commercial consumer applications, to something that's more technical about porting code
from one language to another, to stuff that involves vectors and training with lots of charts.
And finally, a whopper of a commercial project at the end.
So be prepared for lots of juicy building.
And you may have noticed that I have other courses out there.
I'm wondering how this fits in.
Or maybe you've taken some of those other courses, and the answer is that this course is complementary
to the others, and you can take them in any order.
There is perhaps a natural order.
This course is quite foundational and lays the groundwork, so it might be better to take this first,
at least the first couple of weeks of it.
But it doesn't matter if you've taken up on the other ones.
A gigantic AI, a companion course which is all about applying this kind of LLM functionality to different
Agentic use cases and frameworks.
And you can see I've put that there just slightly higher up, because it's it's sort of taking it to
maybe the next step, but you could take identify first and then LLM engineering if you preferred AI
in production is a very different course that I've got that takes whatever you build and allows you
to deploy it at scale in a production setting on a cloud platform like AWS.
And then I also have a briefing for founders and leaders, which is intended for a non-technical audience.
It's commercial first and foremost, but I will say actually that I strongly recommend that even technical
people do consider taking this briefing, because I think it's a super power for tech.
People like us to also have a good sense of the commercial applications of Llms.
And so again, the course is complement each other, take them in whatever order you like.
Maybe it's most natural to start with LM engineering, but it doesn't matter if you've already done
the others and you're coming to it now.
And most importantly, I've designed this curriculum and this course so that it will appeal to everyone.
If you are a complete beginner and you're coming to AI for the first time, prepare to be astonished.
But this will be a nice smooth on ramp for you.
But also, if you're a pro, then sure, some of the stuff in weeks one and two are going to be things
you already know.
Absolutely.
But I'm hoping to to still tease you with some interesting new content to there'll be something that
might surprise you.
Something for everyone.
That's the plan.
All right, just before we get into it, let me now quickly introduce myself.
Yes.
So to convince you that I'm actually qualified to talk to you about this.
My name is Ed Donner.
I am the co-founder and CTO of an AI startup called Nebula.
You can check us out at Nebula.
And I spent most of my career at JP Morgan, where I started out in London, which is where I'm from
originally, and then spent some time in Tokyo and then moved to NYC, which is where I am at right
now.
And most recently at JP Morgan, I was a managing director, running a technology team of about 300
software engineers and scientists.
And before Nebula, I was the founder and CEO of an AI startup called untapped.
And this picture is this is a magical moment for me.
This is a picture from a Times Square billboard on the day that the acquisition of my AI startup was
announced a couple of years ago, which was really great.
Uh, and in case you don't believe me, I can prove it.
If you squint and you look super carefully.
Near the bottom right of that picture is, in fact, a picture of me in there, just to prove that it
was, in fact, me, uh, with this startup.
But that was my my moment in Times Square.
And I think it's obligatory with these things to have some kind of personal life picture.
So here's me in front of a plane that I just flew.
And you might think I'm showing this because I'm very skilled at flying planes, but but quite on the
contrary, uh, my my great talent when it comes to all things LM is only surpassed by my complete inability
to do anything that requires hand-eye coordination.
So if you're walking onto a plane and you glance into the cockpit and you see that it's me there holding
the yoke, then you want to be looking for a parachute really quickly.
Uh, but but if you've come to some online course and it's on LMS and you see that it's this guy giving
the talk on LMS, then congratulations.
That is my sweet spot.
You've come to the right place.
Let's get on with it.
I will just mention also that that one cool thing about that bottom right hand picture is that I actually
live right there as well.
It's strangely not many people live in Times Square, but I live like a block from Times Square, right
behind where that hard Rock cafe guitar is.
I'm kind of behind there, and I'm looking out at that right now.
So.
So you're sort of picture me looking out where those two lines meet right now, and the other place
where I am is on LinkedIn.
And I gotta warn you, I'm gonna go on about this, like, a hundred times.
I love connecting with people on LinkedIn.
Some people are coy about connecting on LinkedIn.
They're like, you can tell me where we met and I might connect with you.
I'm not like that at all.
If if you want to connect with me, then I'm thrilled.
Uh, send me an invite and I'll connect.
You can say hi and I'll say hi back.
It's not an agent.
It'll really be me.
Uh, you could also just, uh, just just send the connect and I'll accept it.
Um, uh, whilst it's not an agent, I do reserve the right occasionally to copy and paste some of my
answers, because I do get through quite a lot of them.
But I will always for sure interact with you and I love it.
And also, if you post information about the course, if you post your progress through the course or
projects that you build, and you tag me on your LinkedIn post, that I will come in and weigh in and
add to it.
And I find it such a fabulous way to amplify your achievement, and also to get other people in the
community, other data scientists, seeing it and responding as well.
So please do, do do that liberally.
It sometimes takes me a few days, but I will get there.
Tag me and let me weigh in.
And so, in summary, I'm a software engineer, a data scientist, an entrepreneur, and a leader in
the field of AI.
But there's something else I do as well.
In 2024, a friend of mine persuaded me to make a Udemy course teaching other people about AI.
And it was, of course, the first version of this course, LM engineering, and I made a few others
since, and I've been so lucky that they've been quite successful.
And there's now more than a quarter of a million people taking my Udemy courses.
And it's been a total joy, and I love interacting with people on it.
It's also such a great opportunity for everyone on it because as I say, you can post on LinkedIn,
I can weigh in and it has such a multiplier effect in the community to get everyone involved in your
journey.
And that's why I urge you to post about it and enjoy the journey, enjoy the experience, and share
it with all of us.

003. Day 1 - Setting Up Your LLM Development Environment with Cursor and UV (6min)

Transcript:
So I have so much in store for you this week.
We're going to start by building an LM solution today.
We're then going to talk about the whole of the next eight weeks to come.
We're going to compare models at the frontier of what's possible.
Today.
I'm going to give you some early intuitions for what Transformers actually are, and will end by building
a commercial product in day five.
And so for today, for the rest of today, we are continuing our instant gratification theme, building
your first LM solution using a frontier model, using a model at the forefront of what's possible.
That's what people call frontier models, the very latest, strongest models on the planet.
But first.
But first we have some drama to get through.
You and I, we have some drama.
We have to set up your environment, set up the environment that you'll be using for working over the
next eight weeks.
And let me tell you, setting up an environment to operate with some of the most groundbreaking data
science available on the planet is not an easy task, and it can be frustrating.
And I would say about 80% of the questions that I get relates to the next ten minutes.
The next time we're going to spend together, building your environment.
So I need to ask you to have a lot of patience.
We're going to get through it.
We're going to get you a brilliant environment that's set up for everything that we're going to do.
But it is a bit traumatic to start with, but let's get to it.
So look, there are five steps to setting up your environment.
And we're going to do all five together.
And it's going to be fine.
The first step is sort of the foundations.
We're going to clone the repo as it's called.
We're just copying all the code from, from GitHub to, to run it locally.
We're going to use cursor as our development environment.
If you want to use something else you absolutely can I suggest cursor but you can use anything.
And then we're going to open the project and step one will be done.
Step two we are going to use a fantastic platform called UV.
UV is an alternative to platforms like Anaconda that you might have heard about.
It's something which allows you to manage your Python environment.
Make sure you have all of the right dependencies, all the packages we rely on, all installed, and
UV has something that's taken the community by storm because it is bulletproof.
It is easy and it is fast.
It's all three you normally have to like pick two of the three, but no, you get all three.
It's so wonderful and you're going to love it.
Then we're going to create an OpenAI API key away for us to call OpenAI.
Now that involves spending a little bit of money.
It involves putting in $5 and you don't need to.
There is a free alternative.
It's fully documented.
We will do that too.
I know some people get get frustrated thinking there's going to be a spend.
If you don't want to spend, you don't need to spend anything.
And we will cover spend very clearly at the time.
That's step three.
You will then add that key to a file called the EMV file.
And there's so many traps here.
If you spell the name of the file wrong.
If you spell the name of the key wrong, any of these things, disaster will ensue.
At least disaster in the form of no environment.
So you'll need to get that right.
But I will point it out to you.
We'll make absolutely sure it's right.
And then finally, step five.
There is no step five.
Step five is we just get started.
We are ready to go.
Now look, most of the time this all goes super smoothly and you're going to be up and running in no
time.
You're going to be wondering what all the fuss is about.
But just sometimes you hit problems and if that happens to you, then there's a troubleshooting notebook
that I will show you, which will walk you through and help you fix any common problems.
ChatGPT or Claude or any llms.
They're really good at helping solve problems.
And you should definitely, Make sure you check what they say they have.
You know they often need to be verified.
Don't just fall naturally into doing whatever they say.
Always check what they do, but they're really good at finding problems.
And then I am here to help.
You can always reach out to me in the platform or by email, or the best ways to reach out to me and
get me to help.
I will say, though, that the documentation that I put together for this course is really thorough,
super comprehensive.
There's great answers to most problems.
The setup instructions linked in the Readme are very, very thorough and whilst I always answer questions,
I will tell you that probably 60% of the questions that I get are answered directly and immediately
in the documentation, and I'm fine with that.
I don't mind being asked, but all I will say is that it's much faster if you look in the documentation
first, because if the answer's there, that's going to be your fastest way to get there.
And most students hit the same problems, they are covered there in the answers.
The famous windows 260 character issue, things like that.
They're all covered in the doc, so check out the docs.
But if in doubt, reach out to me.
I'm here to help.
Okay, okay.
With that, it is time for our first lab.
We're going to get started building this environment and here's how it's going to work.
The next video in the series is going to be for PC people.
I'm going to walk you through as a PC user, how to set up your environment.
The video after that will be for Mac people.
I will walk Mac people through what to do with step by step instructions for Mac, and if you're a Linux
person, then follow the Mac instructions.
They'll be good enough for you and you know your way around this all anyway.
So PC instructions coming next, followed by Mac instructions.
Pick the right video and then once you've gone through your setup and you're ready to go, I will see
everyone in the video after that, which is when we build our first LM project.

004. Day 1 - Setting Up Your PC Development Environment with Git and Cursor (10min)

Transcript:
If you're a PC user, then welcome.
You've come to the right place.
If you're a mac user, then this video is not for you.
You belong in the next one.
Go over there.
All right, PC people.
Now, look, my first job out of college was working for IBM, the PC company.
And so PCs are in my my roots.
So you are my people.
So let's get to working on setting up your environment.
And it's going to be easy.
I hope we're going to start by one more time.
Going to the GitHub repo github.com slash engineering linked all over the place.
And the main reason I show it to you is that if you scroll down, you'll see the contents of the readme,
and that includes links to the setup instructions for you.
And that's where you should go for the detailed walkthrough of everything we're going to do.
And the setup instructions are the best.
That's the best place to go.
You can watch what I do to give give you a feel for the different screens, but the instructions will
take you through things step by step and will show you what could happen and have troubleshooting tips
and so on.
For PCs in particular, there are a few gotchas that are well known and at the very top of the setup
PC instructions I have these gotchas with ways to check that you don't have this problem and how to
fix them, such as having VPNs running such as something called the windows 260 character limit, which
is really nasty.
But there are ways to test to see whether you have that, and if so, exactly how to fix it.
So please do take a look at that.
And then when you're ready, let's get started with your environment.
And so here we go.
You start by going to the start menu.
And up here you type PowerShell to bring up what's called PowerShell, the command prompt that we already
did with Obama.
Now one thing to notice here you can just click on PowerShell to start the PowerShell.
You can also right click and say Run as administrator, which gives you extra powers when you run it.
If you have if you ever have issues that you don't have permissions to do something, the first thing
to try is to come in and run it as administrator to see if that gets around the problem.
So that's worth knowing.
All right.
But with that, we will open up a PowerShell.
This is what it looks like.
And the first thing that I want you to do is type the word git git and enter and see whether you get
something like this.
And that will tell you whether or not git is installed on your computer.
Now, if you're not sure of the difference between git and GitHub, they sound very similar.
They're not the same thing.
If you're not sure, then in the repo there is a folder called guides.
If you go into guides are some great, uh, sets of tutorials on different foundational topics, and
one of them will explain to you what's git, what's GitHub, what's the difference, and so on.
Please do review it.
But let's say that you do know and you've come here.
And if you did not get this this report so you don't have git installed, then follow the instructions
in the Readme.
But basically you go to a browser.
This is showing the setup guide.
You go to this website and you can use this to Is to download git for windows and then have it installed
on your computer.
So follow these instructions, install it, run it locally, and then when you come back here, you
might need to restart your computer afterwards or at least open a new PowerShell.
But once you've done that, you should be able to type git and see this command.
And we're off to a fine start.
Now, if you're not familiar with using the command line, if you don't know the basics of this, then
please go and look in the guides folder again on the repo and read the guide on using the command line,
just to make sure you're comfortable with the basics, with the difference between files and folders
and directories, stuff like that, so that the next few steps will make some sense to you.
It's not important to be an expert, but at least know the foundations.
Okay, so I'm going to clear this screen where we are right now.
You can see we're in the C drive in my home directory users Ed.
And it's very typical in these things to have a subdirectory that you create called projects, which
is where all of your projects belong.
You might already have that, in which case you can type CD projects to change into that directory,
but I don't.
I haven't got one yet.
I've only got my home directory.
And so what I need to do is create a projects directory.
So I'm going to type mkdir make a directory called projects.
There we go.
It's been made I'm still in C.
Users add my home directory.
So I type CD projects to go into this new directory.
And if I look at it LS looks at the contents.
It's empty.
It's a new directory.
It's in C users projects.
Okay.
The next thing we're going to do is an epically famous thing to do.
It's called cloning a repo.
And it's a command git clone which takes a copy of someone's repo, in this case my repo, and puts
it locally on your computer.
And that's what we're going to do.
And we're going to put it right here in the projects directory.
So if I go back to the browser, I'm now going to go back to GitHub.
Hopefully you're comfortable with the difference between GitHub and git.
I'm going to go to the LM engineering repo.
So we're at github.com.
Engineering.
And there's this green button here for which there's code on it.
If I hover over this make sure that Https is selected here.
And it's this is the clone window.
And I'm going to press that little copy URL to clipboard right here.
And that is copying the URL of this repository into my my clipboard.
I can now go back here back to my command line.
And I'm going to type the command which is, which is going to do everything.
I'm going to type git clone.
And then I'm going to paste in that URL right there.
And when I press enter bam it's going to take a few seconds.
But it's now pulling the entire repository and bringing it here locally.
And if I now do an LZ to to list the contents of C users Ed projects, you can see that there is a C
users ed projects lem engineering.
Okay that's exciting.
So now we do see Lem engineering to go into this directory.
See what's here.
We do LZ.
And there it is.
We have the contents of our own repo.
We've got it locally on our computer.
We're ready to go.
Okay.
We're still in step one of the instructions.
It's still step one.
But step one is a is a juicy one.
The next thing we're going to do is we're going to install cursor, which is a development environment
which is very popular because it uses AI to help, uh, fill in your code and it's at cursor just like
that.
C you are.
And of course it's linked in the, in the repo.
Um, and it's the best way to code with AI it claims, will be the judges of that.
And by the way, cursor has a free two week trial.
And then there is it is a paid plan, at least as of today.
But you don't need to pay for it if you don't want to.
You can keep using it as an as an IDE, as development environment, paying for it or not.
Up to you.
You don't.
You don't need to take advantage of the the the AI autocomplete feature.
Also, if you prefer working with VS code cursor is basically the same thing.
It's a fork of VS code, so.
So you can use either for sure, and you can use any IDE that you like.
You can use windsurf, you can use PyCharm whatever you like using.
But you're going to press the download for windows button.
Of course it's going to download it.
You're then going to run that installer.
There's a few things for you to accept.
You have to set up an account.
You have to to agree to something.
And then once you've gone through all of those different screens, you should be ready to open up.
Cursor.
Okay.
So we now go to the start menu and we choose cursor and type in cursor.
It may also be an icon on your desktop, and then you can click on it to launch it.
And cursor should come up like this the first time.
It might ask you a few questions, but once it's all installed and ready, it should look something
like this.
But maybe without the things right here.
If it doesn't look like this, then you can go to file and choose new Window and then you should see
it looking like this.
And the first thing to do is to press Open Project.
Now a project in cursor is an important concept.
It's the folder that the highest level directory that contains all of your work.
In our case it's called LM engineering.
That is also known as our project root.
So what you sometimes call that.
And so we want to open that folder.
And it's important to get this right because if you open the wrong folder things are really confusing
in cursor.
So so get this right.
So where is it.
Well uh it's it's basically it's on our C drive in for me.
It's in users editor and then it's under in my projects folder.
So I find projects and there is LM engineering and I double click on that.
So I'm now looking at the contents of LM engineering.
And then I press select folder to mean this is our project root.
This is where we're going to be.
And it opens up.
And you can see eight weeks of folders.
On the left.
You can see the word LM engineering in block capitals on the top left.
And that is your sign that you've got the right project.
Open this block capitals here telling you you've got the right project.
You're in.
Cursor is open.
LM engineering is open.
Congratulations.
We are actually ready to work on this project okay.
And with that that completes step one of the setup instructions.
And I have good news.
Step one is the only step that is PC dependent.
The rest of the steps will be for both PC and Mac.
So what I'm going to do now is I'm going to put you on hold.
The next video is going to be for the Mac people.
And then when we reconvene, we'll be able to finish everything off with the rest of the steps together.
All right.
So I'll see you in one video from this one.

005. Day 1 - Mac Setup: Installing Git, Cloning the Repo, and Cursor IDE (10min)

Transcript:
Okay.
If you're a mac person, then congratulations, you've come to the right place.
If you're a PC user, then you don't belong here.
You're meant to be on the next video when we get back together again.
So Mac people, I just told the PC people that they are my my people because I used to work for IBM
a while ago.
But but it's not true.
I'm a mac person through and through.
I've.
I've owned Mac since I was a teenager.
All through my life I've owned so many Macs.
I've been programming on them since I was, since I was yay high.
Uh, so this is.
You are my people for sure.
Don't listen to what I said.
The other guys.
Uh, yeah.
I have no loyalty.
Uh, yeah.
No Macs all the way.
Okay, so first step in the setup instructions is to tell you to go to the repo.
Go to GitHub.
Engineering.
This link is all over the place.
I want to remind you again that the best setup instructions are written in the repo.
Follow the link to the Mac instructions.
That's where I go through things step by step.
That's what you should really follow.
Use this video to see how I do it, but be sure to follow the instructions at the top of the instructions.
I've got a few things I call the gotchas.
The things to watch out for.
Stuff like making sure you've got the latest Mac tools installed so there's a few things to watch out
for.
So please do look at those gotchas as well.
And there's there's common troubleshooting tips all the way through that should be your first port of
call is to look at the docs.
But now let's go through setting things up on the Mac.
So the first thing we're going to be doing is talking about git and cloning the current repo.
And if you're not sure about the difference between git and GitHub or you don't know what they are,
then please do take a look.
In the repo there's a folder called guides.
Look within guides.
I've got a guide I've written on what is git?
What is GitHub?
The difference between them.
Be sure to look at that to get get your foundations on that okay.
And then when you're done we're then going to open up a command prompt, a terminal and again instructions
in the repo.
But the way you do it is you go to your finder, you go to applications, you look in utilities and
there's a utility called terminal.
And you double click on that to launch a terminal.
And here I've got one right here for us to work on.
And uh, here we are.
And the first thing that I'm going to do in this terminal is I'm going to type git minus minus version
to find out if I have git installed and what version it is, and I do and there it is.
And if you don't have git installed then when you run that it should prompt you to install it.
Uh, so so follow those instructions or look in the readme so that you definitely have git installed
at this point.
Also, if you're new to the command line, if you're not familiar with using a terminal in this way,
there's another guide on that to look in the guides folder in the repo, look at the guide on the command
line and use this as an opportunity to build up some foundations, some confidence in things like files
and directories moving between them, copying them.
All the basics in a command line just so that you know the lay of the land.
And then we'll get going.
Okay, I'm going to start by typing CD, just to see that I'm in my home directory to find out what
that directory is, I type PWD and it tells me that I'm currently in slash users slash Z.
That's my home directory.
You won't be in user ed unless your name is also ed in, which is high, but you'll be in user slash
your name.
So the next thing we're going to do is create a new directory called projects, where all of our projects
belong.
It's customary to have a directory that you call projects.
You may already have one, in which case you'll be able to type CD projects and you'll go right there.
You may not, in which case we'll need to create one, which is what we'll do now.
And now you can of course use it in a different.
You could have it within another directory like your documents directory.
It's one thing.
One little trap to watch out for is it's best not to have it in a directory that is part of your iCloud
directories, like documents or desktop.
Try and avoid having it on your desktop or in documents.
There's various reasons for that, but one of them is that those those folders are replicated to Apple's
iCloud, and that can cause various problems with repose and slow things down.
And it's not necessary because your repo is already replicated to GitHub.
So recommendation is just to have it in your home directory.
So I'm going to type mkdir make a directory called projects.
There we go.
We've done it.
Now I can CD projects I can go into it.
And if I now do PWD where am I.
I am in users add projects just where I want to be.
Okay, so the next thing I'm going to do is go back to the repo again.
Here it is.
This is the LM engineering repo on github.com.
And there's this green code button.
And I press on this and I make sure that Https is selected like that.
And I'm going to copy this URL to the clipboard.
It says copied.
All right.
So I've now copied the link to this URL.
Okay I now go back to the terminal window again.
Here it is.
And now I type the legendary command git clone.
That means I want to take a copy of someone else's repo.
Well, that's my repo and have it locally on my computer git clone.
And then you paste that link that we just copied.
So we're saying git clone.
And then this remote repo called LM engineering.
And when I press enter it will take a few seconds.
But it's now copying down the entire repository I prove it, I type ls to list the contents of projects.
And there we see.
We have one thing in here.
It's called LM engineering and I can do CD, LM engineering, and then I can do an LZ again.
And there is the contents of LM engineering.
The repo.
It has been cloned.
It is now local on my computer.
So far so good.
Okay.
The next thing we're going to do is still in step one.
Step one is quite a big step.
Step one we're going to go back to the browser again.
And now I want you to go to cursors.
See you are so for this for this uh project we're going to be using cursor as our IDE as our development
environment.
Now you don't need to use cursor if you don't want to.
Cursor is a fork of VSCode.
And if you use VSCode, everything will look basically identical.
And you could also use anything else.
You could use windsurf, you could use PyCharm, whatever you want.
It's all good.
But I'm going to use cursor.
It's nice.
I like the AI features.
Uh, you have to pay for the AI features, but you get two weeks free trial, at least as of today if
you're new to it.
Otherwise it's a it's a paid plan, but you don't need to pay it.
If you don't pay it, you just don't get the the cool AI autocomplete with frontier models, but it's
completely up to you.
Um, there's a download button here, download for Mac OS.
I can press that button.
It will then download it in the usual way, and then I can open it, I can launch it.
And there will then be an installation process when I have to answer a few questions, set up an account,
select what I want and you should just pick all the defaults, get it all set up, uh, and uh subscribe
to it.
Use the free trial of course.
Uh, and then get things going so you can then launch cursor and be ready to go.
And once you've installed cursor, you can launch it either from your applications folder in your finder
window, or it might be an icon on your desktop.
Uh, or it might be in your system, uh, tray.
But you can then launch it and it should open and it should look like this.
This is a sort of new start screen.
And if it doesn't look like this, even after you've answered any first time questions, then there's
a file menu.
Go to the file menu and choose New Window and this should come up just like this.
You won't have this stuff here.
You'll just have these buttons I imagine.
And the first thing we're going to do is open a project.
So a project in cursor refers to the top level folder known as the project root, which contains all
of your code.
In our case, it's LM engineering, the thing we just cloned.
And that's what we're going to open as our project right now.
Okay.
So I come in here I click Open Project.
I'm now in editor.
So within editor I go into projects and here's LM engineering.
And now this is a bit fiddly.
You double click on LM engineering.
So we're now looking at the contents of LM engineering.
And now you press open.
It's saying that's the folder that is our folder.
And this pops up and this is everything.
This is.
This is the beginning of all of our stuff together.
So the thing you want to look for, you want to check that you see the different weeks appearing here
as folders, weeks one to week eight.
And you also want to check that in block capitals.
On the top left is LM engineering.
That's telling you that that we have opened the right folder.
If you've got this chat thing over here you can get rid of this.
This is the AI chat.
One way to get rid of it is just to drag that over like that.
But but this is the screen that I like to see.
So here we are.
We've opened the LM project in cursor.
And that completes step one of our five step instructions.
And now we have good news that the remaining steps are steps that we can do with our PC colleagues.
At the same time, we can do them together because it's going to be identical.
So I will now at this point say congratulations on step one complete.
I will see you in the next video with everyone back together again for step two through step five.
See you then.

006. Day 1 - Installing UV and Setting Up Your Cursor Development Environment (8min)

Transcript:
Welcome back to PC and Mac people.
We have come together.
Both of you have completed the first step of the setup instructions.
We are now embarking on the remaining steps and they are hopefully super easy.
You've got cursor up and running, you've got LM engineering in block capitals on the top left like
this.
If you have this this chat screen over here, you can get rid of it by clicking here and just dragging
over to the right till it goes away.
So you're left with this.
If you're not seeing the files on the left here, then you can go to the view menu and select explorer.
And it will come up.
And you should be right here.
Now one thing you'll notice is that the some of the setup instructions, the readme should be here.
You should be able to click on the readme and it comes up.
But when it comes up it comes up looking like this.
It's what they call markdown.
It's a particular type of formatted text.
The way to see it in all of its formatted glory is to right click on it and say Open Preview.
And when you do that, you will see it like this in all its glory.
And you can use this now.
You don't need to go to the website anymore.
You can use this to follow the instructions and to find all the links you need.
You'll also have all the guides you'll have.
Everything that was on GitHub is now locally on your computer right here.
Congratulations.
So we're going to start now by installing and using this thing called Uuv which is wonderful.
And I already told you this, but it's wonderful because it's fast, it's bulletproof and it's easy.
And and that's why we love it.
It's it's taken the data science world by storm.
It's now used in all sorts of ways.
It's used for MCP, it's used by crew AI, it's used by by lots of people.
And increasingly it's becoming the standard for these things.
It's something which makes sure that we're all using exactly the same version of Python, and that we
have exactly the same dependencies and that they work on our computer, and it's really great.
Enough of the sales pitch.
Let's actually use it.
Now, the first thing we need to do is to bring up a terminal window within cursor.
Cursor has built into it a terminal window which is easier to use than than doing it using the Mac or
PC's built in ones.
So the way that you do it is you can go to the the view menu and select from there.
Uh, the terminal option, it's it's on the view menu.
But there is also a shortcut.
And that shortcut is to press the control button and find the the back tick.
Not a normal apostrophe but a back tick, which on my keyboard is right next to the number one.
Um, and control not not command.
So control and backtick and up comes a little terminal like this in LM engineering.
So that's a thing to know.
When you're in this terminal, it's worth knowing you can open a second terminal by pressing the plus
button here.
And now you can see we've got two terminals.
And we can get rid of any of them like that.
So it's worth understanding.
You can have multiple terminals running.
You can also open a new terminal by pressing Shift Control Backtick.
And now that just opened a second terminal right here, and you can type exit in a terminal to get rid
of it as well.
And that gives you the basics of using terminals within cursor.
Okay.
And now within the terminal I'm going to type UV minus minus version to check that I have UV installed.
And you probably don't.
So when I do that I get a version and you might get an error.
And if you get an error it means time to install UV.
So the link to UV installation guide is in the setup instructions.
I've got it right here.
Um, it is uh, the, the installation uh, it's Doctor Astral is the company behind UV UV getting started
installation.
It's linked in the setup guide.
Uh, all of Uv's documentation is absolutely first class.
If you want to be a UV expert, just spend a few moments on their docs.
It's really easy to use.
Installation.
Super simple.
If you're on Mac.
Then you just use this command right here.
If you're on windows, then start by just using this command right here.
If you have any problems with it at all.
If this doesn't work for you, there's lots of other ways.
The second way I recommend using is winget.
Winget is also very simple to use, so that might be another one.
But but do run this to install it.
And the way you run it of course is you would copy this or I'll use the Mac version.
You would copy this and then go back to the cursor terminal and then paste that command in there and
run it.
I'm not going to do that, of course, because I have already done it and I have you've installed.
But once you do that, it will install and once it's installed.
And this is important, this is a little trap.
You need to then open a new terminal to use it, because you need to pick up the environment variable
change.
So if you type UV minus minus version you might still get an error.
You'd have to open a new terminal like this for it to work.
And if it still doesn't detect UV, you might even need to restart your box.
But you shouldn't need to.
And if after you restart your box you still have a problem, then you might need to try one of the other
installation approaches.
If you're on a mac and you get errors to do with permissions, a problem with your your bash profile,
then that's a sign that you've installed things in the past using a command called sudo, which means
that you've you've got your profile files with two high permissions, which is a setup problem on your
Mac.
I've got instructions for how to fix that.
So to look for it or email me if you're not sure.
But that's very, very fixable.
But it's a standard Mac issue, which is very fixable.
Anyways, at this point you should be at a point where you can type UV minus minus version and you do
indeed see a version of UV.
And the next command I'm going to ask you to run is UV self update, which just makes sure that you're
on the very latest version of UV, which you probably are because you just installed it, but if you
didn't just install it like me, then it will update you.
You can see I went from naught .8.1 5 to 0 .8. 22 and you might be on something even more than that.
But now we have the latest.
Congratulations.
Okay, it's ready for showtime now.
We're now going to run a two word command and it is as follows.
It is UV space sync sync.
And I just want to be clear that in the the prior version of this course I used Anaconda a bulletproof
powerful data science package management system, which is very, very bulletproof and powerful.
But it takes some significant time.
And in fact, I would tell people that it could take up to an hour or maybe more to build your full
spec environment.
So keep that in mind.
We're now going to do the equivalent with UV using UV sync.
And here we go.
Off it goes.
I've just pressed it to run and uh, let's um, uh, you, you can say yes for that, but it's not necessary.
Uh, it's just run that that whole UV sync process ran.
It might take a little bit longer for you because it needs to download the packages from the internet
the first time, and mine were already cached locally, but nonetheless, it should be a matter of minutes
at the most under ten minutes for sure.
It is order of magnitude faster than Anaconda.
Uh, it's it's really amazing.
The whole environment has just been built.
And for people familiar with virtual environments, it's basically built this dot vmv this this virtual
environment file folder right here.
Um, and within this, all of the packages that we depend on, it did everything and it did it in a
flash.
Uh, how does it do it so fast?
Well, it's written in rust.
It's a super fast, uh, and it's just really great.
So we now have a full spec environment.
It's built.
And step two of the setup is complete.
Congratulations.
You have your own UV environment.

007. Day 1 - Setting Up Your OpenAI API Key and Environment Variables (12min)

Transcript:
Now.
Steps three and four of the set of instructions are optional.
I strongly recommend that you get an account with OpenAI if you don't have one already, so that we
can use the most powerful models on the planet, and OpenAI is a good one to start with.
But you don't need to.
It requires a payment $5 up front, and you might not want to spend that.
And you can use free models throughout this course.
You can use Gemini or you can use llama.
And there are detailed instructions for how to do it.
And I will have an example lab as well.
But assuming that you do want to go ahead and set up an OpenAI account, you may already have one as
well.
Let's do that.
That is step three, and feel free to skip this or just watch what I do if you don't want to.
So you go to a web browser.
I've got an incognito tab here.
So because I'm already logged into OpenAI, but you go to platform OpenAI, that is where you come to
the kind of the API side of OpenAI, not to use ChatGPT, but to have your own account to use the API.
and that's an important point.
Some people are confused about the fact that there is ChatGPT the product which you can interact with
and which has a paid plan for like $20 a month and an even higher tier paid plan.
And then separate to that, there is an API, the OpenAI API, for connecting to the model directly.
And people, some people are confused about that and say, hey, if I'm paying for one, why can't I
have the other?
Luckily, I've written a guide about exactly that.
There's a guide called Technical Foundations, which you'll find in the guides folder.
It takes you through some of the foundational information to help you navigate through some of these
concepts.
And I explain very clearly the difference between the product ChatGPT and using the API from an AI engineer's
point of view.
So do please read that if you've got any confusion.
But assuming that that's that's obvious to you, then then great, come here.
Come to platform OpenAI.
And the first thing to do is to click sign up.
And you can then come in and use like your your Google auth any or Microsoft account or an Apple account,
or just create an account with an email address.
I think people that are coming internationally outside the US, you might need to click a button like
create organization or something first.
You might need to click through some screen before you get to create your account, but it should be
pretty obvious you should get here.
Sign up for an account.
So far, it's completely free.
The money will come in just a second.
The $5 spend.
Uh, let's let's, uh, come back once you've set up your account.
Okay.
So this is what you see once you come to platform and once you've signed in with an account, and the
navigation is just a little bit confusing, but you have to be aware that at the top here there's dashboard.
And over on the right there's settings.
And the first thing to do is to go over to settings, which is where the billing information is, and
go to settings and then come down to billing right here.
And this is where you get to put a balance on OpenAI.
OpenAI is a pay as you go model, which means you put down an amount of money and then you draw down
against that over time and you only spend.
Tiny amounts of money on this course.
We will spend fractions of a cent, typically for each of our projects.
Except where I tell you otherwise, you should always track your your spend always come back here.
The nice thing about this is that because it's a pay as you go model, you're always paying up front.
You're not likely to get some kind of surprise as long as you only top up with a small amount.
There are some some other services like AWS where it doesn't work that way, which I don't like.
This one is better because you get to be in complete control of your spend.
Nonetheless, you should come back and have a look at it.
You should always have auto recharge off.
You don't want it to automatically recharge.
Don't press that.
Enable auto recharge button.
You don't want it automatically billing to your credit card, unless this is something that you're in
production and you know exactly what you're doing.
So the first thing you do when you come in here, you should see zero credit balance.
And you will want to press the Add to credit balance button.
And you'll want to to type in an amount there.
And you'll want to select a payment method.
And then once you've done that, you would then add that amount and sorry, $5 is the minimum.
You don't need to spend $10.
$5 is the minimum payment amount.
You will then draw down and that lasts a year.
So you've got you've got plenty of time to spend that $5.
You need to make sure that your payment methods includes a valid credit card that you can charge against.
Otherwise, OpenAI will throw various errors.
So make sure that you add a proper payment method which it can use.
And I should mention a lot of students do have problems with payments not being accepted, getting declined
through through OpenAI.
And it's worth pointing out that almost always most of the time, any time that I've been aware of that
problem is with your credit card not accepting OpenAI's charge as an international vendor, OpenAI is
happy to take your money if you let it.
It's unlikely to be a problem with OpenAI.
It's more likely that your credit card company, for whatever reason, is refusing an international
charge.
And so you might need to go into your to your bank account and select something which enables that kind
of charge.
Perhaps something to look out for.
Otherwise, if you if you really can't get past this and can't get a balance on there, then you can
contact OpenAI support.
They're actually really responsive.
Okay.
But let me assume you've done this.
This is now showing $5 and it's looking great.
You've got a good payment method associated with your account.
We're ready to set up an API key.
Okay.
So you're still in settings.
You're still seeing this menu up here.
And the first thing to do is to select API keys up here making sure you're under the organization heading.
You're right up here API keys.
And here you go.
You can see that that I have some API keys.
And you're going to make one yourself.
Right now these are your API keys.
And it's super important to be careful about what you do next.
You're going to press the Create new Secret key button like so.
You're going to want to create a new secret key.
It is owned by you not service account.
You can give it whatever name you want, but something that you remember, like, uh, LM engineering
key.
And now be careful with this for the project.
Select default project because you don't want to have any extra constraints.
If people if you do anything clever here that that constrains it in some way, then you might get errors
later.
So just have default project, which means any project can access this and leave permissions at all.
And then you're going to press the Create secret key button.
And when you do that which I will do it now it will come up with a key like this.
And fear not I'm going to delete this key right afterwards.
Aha.
Uh this key is your key with OpenAI.
It's your way to link your code to using OpenAI.
And it begins ESC hyphen, hyphen.
And then this long thing right here.
And that is your secret key.
And that's something which we're going to be using in our code.
And if you get this wrong, if you type, if you, if you change one of these numbers or one of these
letters, it's like a password.
Everything has to be right.
If something's wrong, it's not going to work.
So copy it into your clipboard by pressing copy.
It's now copied.
So when you press paste, it's going to paste.
And in a minute we're going to paste it somewhere.
And please now don't don't paste it somewhere else first and then copy it again or anything that might
mess with the key.
Let it be in your clipboard in pristine shape.
We're not going to change it.
We're going to paste it exactly as it is into our actual inter cursor.
So keep it like this.
In fact, you don't even need to press the done button yet.
You can keep this screen up here.
We're going to go back to cursor and put this in cursor right away.
Let's go do that.
So here I am back in cursor.
By the way if you have one of your terminal screens appearing like this, you can close it just by pressing
the X button there.
So you've got nice clean screen.
Okay.
What we're going to do now is create a file called the file, which is a file that contains your secrets.
And it's super important that you do this carefully.
It's got to be right or things ain't going to work.
So?
So this needs to be right.
The EMV file is a new file we're going to create, which has to be at the top level.
It has to be a file within LM engineering not inside any of these directories.
So what we can do is we can get this little blank space just here underneath the bottom of this list
of files.
You can right click there and say new file.
And you can see it's now giving me a new file.
And you can just double check.
It's at the same top level as all these other top level files.
And I'm going to call it it's going to be called exactly a period dot like that.
And then the letter E and the letter n and the letter v e v and it can't be called dot EMV dot txt.
It can't be called EMV in your name.
It can't be called EMV dot it.
In case you didn't get the message, it's got to be called EMV and only that and it's got to be in the
project root in this top folder.
And there it is.
That is the right place to be Okay.
And now what I'm going to put in here is going to be my open AI key.
And here's how you do it.
You have to type open AI underscore API underscore key.
And it's got to be exactly this open AI underscore API underscore key.
It's got to be in block capitals.
It's not this it's not open API key.
It's open AI API key.
Now you wonder why I'm going on about this.
I get more than a thousand emails every couple of during every few weeks.
I get that many emails from people that have mistyped these words.
So don't do that.
Spell it open AI API key exactly like this.
Uh, then equals it's open ai API key equals.
And then you're going to press paste.
And when you do paste it's going to paste in that key that you copied from the open AI screen.
Let's check it out.
Look it's open OpenAI.
API key equals sq.
Proj dash.
And then this long funny thing.
And there's nothing crazy at the end of it.
We haven't pasted in an extra space.
An extra empty.
We've been careful.
It is exactly this.
Now, that white blob just to the right there means that I haven't yet saved this file.
It's not been saved.
It's not on the disk, which means it's empty as far as my computer is concerned.
So I have to press command S Ctrl s on a PC, command S on a mac or file save to save it, and the white
blob goes away.
And that means it's now saved.
This is now in the file I get, I get, I get hundreds of emails from people that haven't saved the
files.
Saved the file.
You'll see that there is a little stop sign next to it.
I also get hundreds of emails from people that are worried about that stop sign.
But that stop sign is actually good news.
That stop sign is cursor telling you if you hover over it, it will tell you.
It's telling you that AI features are disabled for this file.
And the reason for that is that this file contains your secrets.
This contains your precious key that connects you to OpenAI and to your credit card.
And we don't want that leaking out.
And particularly we don't want cursor sending this off to different AI to get some sort of information
on it.
So as a result, cursor is saying, hey, hands off.
I'm I'm not going to touch this file.
I'm not going to do AI suggestions for this file.
This file is secretly just for you.
So we like to see that stop sign.
That is good news.
Look out for it in anything with secrets in it.
Like the EMV file.
All right I think I belabored this one enough.
You've got a EMV file.
It's called exactly EMV.
It's in your project root.
In the top level.
It says OpenAI API key in block capitals equals.
And then it's got this key right here that you have taken from your your actual API key that you took
from OpenAI.
And you pasted it in here.
Congratulations.
You've got through the hardest part of the whole course getting the API key in there.
Let's move on.

008. Day 1 - Installing Cursor Extensions and Setting Up Your Jupyter Notebook (9min)

Transcript:
Welcome to step five of the setup, the very final step.
I'm here in Cursa and just before we get going in Cursa, we have to install some things called Cursa
extensions.
It might prompt you.
It might say, do you want to install the recommended extensions?
In which case just say yes because it will get them right.
But but if not, then we just need to install them.
If you've never done this before and very simple to do, you start by going to the view menu and you
select extensions.
And this comes up over on the left where the files were.
And you now need to search for Python to bring up the Python extensions, which does things like coloring
in code nicely and checking it and the like.
Now there are in fact two different Python extensions.
One of them is made by someone called Innersphere.
Well, Innersphere is actually the name of the makers of Cursa.
So this is the one for for Cursa.
There's another one made by Mr. Python, which happens to be the going name for Microsoft, better known
as Microsoft, and either of these will do just great.
I have the Microsoft one installed.
You can have the one you click on it, make sure that you install it, and then you'll have Python installed.
And then back to the search and search for Jupyter.
And then you'll see that there is Jupyter by this company, Miss Tools AI, better known again as Microsoft.
And this has like 4 million downloads and it's great.
And Jupyter, which is the name of the particular type of data science interactive work that we'll be
doing Jupyter you want to install as well.
Mine's already installed, which is why it says uninstall there.
And so make sure that both of those are installed.
And once you've done that, finally you go back to the view menu and you go to explorer again to bring
back the files on the left.
You open the week one folder, the week one directory, and and click on day one dot ipynb, which stands
for IPython notebook, which is one of these kinds of things.
And congratulations, you've opened the day one notebook.
We're so nearly there.
The very, very final step is to go to this thing here that says select kernel.
The kernel is the name of the of the Python process, which is going to be running behind all of this
that we're about to work through.
So you have to press this button, select kernel.
And it will pop up with this little pop up saying Python environments or existing Jupyter server.
It all sounds very high tech.
You choose Python environments and you should get this list.
You may only have one option on your list, but you should have something where the top option should
have a star next to it.
It should be called dot env and it should say Python 3.12. something.
It might be 3.1, 2.1, 10.11.
And it should have this kind of path dot venv bin python this thing and it should say recommended.
And this is the one to pick and it should look beautiful.
It's referring to that folder right there.
You see on the left.
That's what this is pointing to.
Now, if this doesn't pop up as an option, then go to the troubleshooting notebook that is in the setup
folder.
And that is where it will help you out.
But it should do.
Hopefully you should be able to select it.
It's now selected and we have ourselves a Jupyter notebook that's ready to go.
These things are called Jupyter notebooks.
Uh, these this type of format of thing, this dot ipynb.
And that is now set.
If you need help, then you go to the setup folder.
There is a troubleshooting ipynb.
And that is where you'll get more instructions for troubleshooting.
But hopefully you now have this open.
You're looking at this.
You have your your environment set.
Your kernel is set.
It's finally time to go through our first lab.
So these things are sometimes called labs, sometimes called notebooks.
They're like Python files which have mixtures of of text, formatted text and code.
And you can run the code piece by piece.
Each of the pieces are called cells.
You may be if you're if you're already in data science, you know this stuff super well.
Uh, but, you know, uh, I'm going to explain it to the others.
Now I've used I've treat these like, like living, breathing documents with tons of good interesting
material.
And I do ask that you spend a moment to read through them, particularly this first one, because I
give a real lay of the land here.
I explain that we're about to embark on our first LLM project and look, it's a simple one, but you've
got to start somewhere.
And for the pros, you can really rattle through this really fast.
But you know, we we have to do something simple later in the course.
We're going to be building a complete agentic platform with multiple agents collaborating and doing
all sorts of stuff with, with many different llms involved.
But we're starting small.
That's the way to do it.
What we're going to build is something which is a different kind of web browser.
It's something which is able to take a web address or URL and find a scrape it, and then make a summary
of that web page and display that summary in a nice format.
It's our own little Reader's Digest of the internet.
That's what we're building.
And and sure, you could, you know, ChatGPT now the product has some things like this built into it
that you could ask it, but we're basically building our own.
We're building a product like that ourselves, and we're going to do it using an API call to the underlying
GPT model.
Okay.
So I do want to point out if you're new to using these things called notebooks, they're also called
labs, also known as Jupyter Lab.
As you now know that I've got lots of guides here that will help you through this.
There's I think you already know there's guides to the command line, guides to using git and GitHub.
There's some technical foundations to to explain things like endpoints and APIs and environment variables.
And then there is this guide all about using notebooks, which you should look at to learn more about
how to use notebooks.
And there's also some Python foundations if you're new to Python as well.
Um, also, we'll talk a lot about what to do if you want to use models other than OpenAI, such as
using Gemini, which has some free tiers, or using llama with local models, there is a guide that
goes through all that as well that you can have a preview look at, but we'll be doing it together.
A reminder that I am here to help you.
You know that you can reach out to me by email through the platform, and you can always connect with
me on LinkedIn.
I might have mentioned that something I kind of like, so feel free to do it.
Uh, there's the troubleshooting notebook.
That's that's right here as well that it is in the setup folder troubleshooting right there.
So go to troubleshooting if you have any problems.
And as I say if this is stuff you already know about then just speed me up.
Put me on two x.
Go go through this nice and quickly.
Uh.
And I'll hope to to throw in some interesting stuff as well.
But we will get to more juicy stuff very soon.
Now, the way that I run these labs is a bit different to some other courses you might be familiar with,
and I make the point here, and I do ask you to read through this.
I don't like to sit here typing while you watch.
I will do that a little bit because I know people want to see that.
I'll do a bit of it, but I feel like that's not a good use of either of our time, particularly in
a day with AI tools as well.
I prefer to show you some code to explain how it works and why it works, to run it, and for you to
also run it.
Put in print statements, change it, make it your own.
Investigate it.
Experiment with it.
That's the best way to learn.
Not by sitting there typing things through.
Now some people like to type and that's that's all good.
Of course you can just delete the cell and then retype it, or create an empty new notebook and start
from scratch as you wish.
Everyone learns differently, but I suggest dig into the code, explore it, experiment with it, and
use this as your starting point for your own projects.
So.
So make your variations and then it's it's great practice.
It also gives you an opportunity to make a variation and post it on LinkedIn and tag me.
And that's something that I will happily weigh in and make sure that I amplify your achievement.
Look at the fact that these labs will be changing all the time.
I constantly update them, sometimes multiple times a week, to have the latest models to have better
explanations as people ask questions.
So please assume that these.
The text here is a living, breathing document, and if what you see on the screen doesn't match exactly
what I'm saying, don't worry about it.
What you're seeing is better and I'll try.
I won't subtract anything.
I'll only add more good stuff.
So so welcome.
The fact that there could be new content that you're looking here.
And finally, I do want to try and emphasize the business value of everything that we build.
Whilst I'll try and make it fun and entertaining, I will also come back to talk about the commercial
impact of what we do, and there'll be commercial exercises for you at the end.
All right.
And then it tells you about installing the cursor extensions, which we've done.
Select the kernel which we've done, and it's time now for us to get going with some code.

009. Day 1 - Running Your First OpenAI API Call and System vs User Prompts (12min)

Transcript:
Okay, so now you scroll to this first box right here which says imports.
And the way that you run this bit of code known as a cell is you hold down the shift button and you
press return.
While you've clicked anywhere in this box, I press this and it runs.
Now, if you have any errors running this, if you get an import error or something like that, or if
it just doesn't seem to run, it just sits there.
It means your kernel isn't set right.
Look on the top right there.
Look at what mine says.
It needs to look a bit like that 3.12. something.
It needs to be referring to your local venv right there.
That is what you have to see.
And then it should run just fine.
There's no output yet.
Nothing's happened.
It should run.
It should show a tick mark, meaning that it's run.
You've just done some imports.
We'll talk more about what all of this does later, but for now, just run that code.
Okay.
The next thing we're going to do.
So come down to this next block of code right here is we are going to load in that dot EMV file, that
secret file with our environment variables, our secrets.
We're going to load it in.
And we're then going to collect this thing called OpenAI underscore API underscore key.
And as long as you set it right then it's going to find a key and it's going to be happy.
Let me see I hold down shift I hit enter and it says API key found and looks good so far.
Now if yours doesn't say that then something's wrong with your EMV file and it's going to give some
explanation.
Hopefully.
Maybe it doesn't start with the right thing.
Maybe you forgot to save your env file.
Something went wrong.
You can go to the troubleshooting lab to dig into it, or you can have a look yourself and try and figure
out why it wasn't able to read in your EMV file, but I'm hoping it did.
You're in great shape.
You found an API key.
All is good.
Let's make our first call to OpenAI running in the cloud.
Now we're going to call OpenAI in the cloud.
And if you don't want to, if you want to use Olama, then wait for tomorrow in day two.
We're going to redo this using Olama running locally, so that will be your day.
So never fear, it will happen.
But for now, what we're going to do here is we are going to, uh, to send this message to OpenAI to
GPT two.
We're actually going to use GPT five, the new version of GPT.
And what are we going to do?
We're going to say, hello, GPT.
This is my first ever message to you.
Hi.
Uh, so I've put that in this variable message.
Now, the first thing I have to do is I have to put that into another variable called messages, which
is in a special format that OpenAI expects.
And you'll see that cursor already fills in what it knows I'm going to do, but I'm going to ignore
cursor.
I'm going to type it because I know some people like me to type, so I'm going to type.
So what you send to OpenAI, the format is a particular format that OpenAI came up with, and we're
going to talk so much more about this format.
So I don't want you to worry about it right now.
I'm just going to tell you that it is a Python list and the Python list contains a number of dictionaries.
Python dictionaries.
In this case, we're only going to have one dictionary.
There it is.
So it's a list with one dictionary in it.
And that dictionary is going to have two keys.
One key is called role.
And the other key is going to be called content.
And that role we're going to put in that in for the key role.
We're going to have the value being the word user.
And we'll find out why later.
And there's going to be another field, another field with key content.
And what we're going to put in there is going to be that message.
Hello GPT, this is my first ever message to you.
Okay, that's all clear.
Let's just print what that see what that looks like.
It looks like uh, list with one dictionary in it with role user content.
Hello, GPT, this is my first ever message to you.
Hi.
Okay.
That's easy.
Next up, I'm going to hover down here like this.
And I'm going to add in.
So I just hit another code block by pressing code right there okay.
Now I'm going to type in, um, OpenAI equals open a equals open AI like that.
I'm creating a new instance of an object, OpenAI.
And again we will cover exactly what that's doing another time.
And now I'm going to make my first API call to GPT running on the cloud.
And this is how I do it I type response equals OpenAI dot chat dot completions dot create.
And that might sound like it's nonsense to you.
You will get so used to that that you're going to dream it eventually.
But for now, just believe me, that's what we type.
It's known as the Chat Completions API.
And you say OpenAI completions create.
We pass in the name of a model.
And the name we're going to go with is GPT five Dash nano, a very cheap version of the latest model,
GPT five.
At least the latest for me right now.
And then the messages I'm going to pass in is going to be this variable messages that we just created.
And that is it that is going to call GPT.
And with what comes back, what we want to take is we want to take this response and we want to take
the choices variable there.
We want to take the first choice message content.
There it is.
That's what we're going to do.
I'm going to now press shift and enter.
And when I do that it's actually going to call out to to GPT running in the cloud.
Let's do it.
Let's see what happens.
It takes a little bit of time for for that.
And it says, hi there.
Nice to meet you and welcome.
Thanks for saying hi.
I'm here to help with questions, explanations, writing, brainstorming, planning, learning and more.
Encoding.
What would you like to do today?
If you're not sure, here are a few quick ideas.
And on it goes.
So, a very verbose answer for our very first call to GPT running in the cloud.
And it was all pretty easy.
And we were running it from code.
And if you know all this already, then good for you.
Zoom through it.
If this is completely new to you, then we're going to talk a lot more about this.
It's going to all make absolute sense very soon.
But I want you to enjoy your first call to an LLM.
Okay.
So I have written a little function that is called fetch website contents.
And that little function is right here in scraper pi.
Now this is what it looks like.
This is not a course about web scraping.
So I don't plan to tell you about what I've done here.
I'm using a lovely package called Beautifulsoup that's very popular.
You can look at this function if you wish and use it yourself.
But it's very, very simple.
And it's doing just what's known as a server side scrape that it just collects that web page.
It's not actually rendering this web page.
So it's not a very sophisticated web scrape, but it fetches the contents of this URL.
So that's what we're using here.
And for example, I could pass in my own personal web page https.
Com and I could use fetch website contents and see what I get there and what I get if I run.
This is a whole lot of stuff from my website.
And if I actually if I say like print ad, then we'll get something a little bit more than that.
And here it is.
This is the contents of my web page with lots of stuff.
And it's worth noting that nothing to do with AI at this point.
This web scrape is just a simple fetch of a web page.
That's it.
But now we're going to start to involve AI in this.
So I imagine most of you know this already, but some of you might not that there are these two different
kinds of message that you send to an AI, to an LLM, two different kinds of prompt.
One is called the system prompt and one is called the user prompt.
And the system prompt is where you specify the frame, the overall task they're carrying out.
You tell them what tone they should take.
You give them context.
We'll find out later.
When we talk about things like Rag that you can supply information in the system prompt, it's your
way of setting the scene.
The user prompt is the actual message coming from an end user to the LM that it should respond to in
the context of whatever you told it in the system prompt.
So that's the difference between the system prompt and the user prompt.
And people that are very familiar with this can can add all sorts of stuff to that.
But but we will get there in good time.
So for example, we could have a system prompt that says you are an assistant that analyzes the contents
of a website and provides a short summary, ignoring texts that might be navigation related respond
in markdown.
It's framing the situation, it's setting the task.
It's giving the format, the style of how response should come.
That is our system prompt.
And we're going to to also define the start of our user prompt, which is.
Here are the contents of a website.
Provide a short summary in markdown if it includes news or announcements, then summarize these two.
That is our user prompt prefix.
So far so good okay, so we saw a second ago that when we're sending a message to OpenAI, we do it
using this list of dictionaries.
And I showed you one in particular which had role user content.
And then we had something like hi GPT.
So there's another type of dictionary where you say role not user but system.
And in fact this is how you specify the system prompt and the user prompt.
Uh, you have a list of dictionaries and we'll have two dictionaries in one dictionary the role is system.
And the content will then be the system message.
In the second dictionary, the role is user and the content is the user message, the user prompt.
And so just just to give you a silly example, here's one.
Here's messages role is system content.
Let's say not.
You're a snarky assistant.
Let's say you're a helpful assistant.
And then what is two plus two.
So this would be messages.
And what we can do is then we can say here response is open AI.
Look at how cursor fills it in for me.
Look at that response is open chat completions dot create model will go with GPT 4.1.
Mini know we'll make it 4.1 nano make it a really cheap, simple model.
GPT 4.1 is faster than GPT five.
It'll be very, very quick.
And we pass in this these messages, this this list of two.
So let's see what a helpful assistant has to say about this.
The helpful assistant.
When given this question uh, we need to print the results.
Cursor didn't fill that in response.
Dot choices zero dot message content.
Try it again.
Two plus two equals four.
So now we're going to change the system message.
So it doesn't say you're a helpful assistant.
It says you are a snarky assistant.
And otherwise exactly the same user message.
What is two plus two.
We run this.
And oh finally a math question.
Two plus two equals four.
Groundbreaking.
I know that's just the effect of putting in snarky there.
And now a quick challenge for you in the spirit of of changing things and tweaking the code.
Make a different system prompt here.
Not a snarky assistant, but something else.
Maybe an assistant that speaks like a cowboy, or like a pirate, or an assistant that speaks in pig
Latin or in another language.
Whatever you want, put it in there.
Experiment.
Try changing the system prompt several times and get to see how different system prompts with the same
user prompt will change the tone, character, and mission assigned to the LM.

010. Day 1 - Building a Website Summarizer with OpenAI Chat Completions API (10min)

Transcript:
Okay, it's finally time to put this all together.
So before we created our messages, just by setting a variable messages and building that list of dictionaries,
what we can also do is write ourselves a little function.
This is a function called messages for, and it takes in the contents of a website and it will return
our list of dictionaries.
It's going to return two dictionaries.
The first of them is role system content.
Is the system prompt that we defined up there somewhere.
The second one is role user and the content is the user prompt prefix, followed by this website that's
passed in.
Okay, that sounds good.
Remember the prefix looks up there.
Maybe we should put in an extra empty line there.
That's probably a good idea.
Uh, so that that website will then get get shoved in underneath.
All right, let's run this.
We've just defined a function that will return this list of dictionaries when we pass in a website.
So we have a website.
We have one in the variable AD.
It contains all of my personal web page.
So if I run this cell, we'll see what we get.
We get something which is indeed a list of dictionaries.
There's one dictionary that's that's got role system content, and it's your assistant analyzes contents
of a website and then role user.
Here are the contents of a website.
And if I scroll you will see that it's got the full contents of my website.
So hopefully this is super simple.
We've we've written a function.
It can manufacture this list of dictionaries.
The list of dictionaries contains a system prompt and a user prompt.
The system prompt is telling it.
You summarize websites.
The user prompt says, hey, here's a website to summarize, and then it has the contents of the website.
Okay?
And now it's time to bring it together in this lovely function right here.
Okay.
And just before we run this summarize function, I want to mention I did just make a little tweak to
the system prompt I added in this sentence do not wrap the markdown in a code block.
And this is a little trick that you sometimes see that prevents it from putting extra stuff around the
response.
Not super important, but makes the results a bit better.
Okay, so this here this summarize.
This is the function that brings it all together.
We start it takes a URL, a URL like madonna.com.
It starts by calling fetch.
Website contents that you'll remember is my utility that goes off and pulls a website's contents.
We put that in a variable website.
We then call OpenAI.
Create.
That is the chat completions API.
That is new to you now, but you will soon know that off by heart you will.
You will dream it.
You will know it so well.
It takes two things.
It takes a model.
And we'll be using GPT 4.1 mini.
And it takes messages, which needs to be the list of dictionaries.
Well, we can get that by calling our function messages for for our website that function just here.
It returns the list of dictionaries exactly what we want, and with whatever comes back, we call choices
zero content.
Let's run that function.
It's now been defined and let's give it a try.
Let's call it for my website and see what comes back.
This is now making the system and user message, putting in a dictionary and dictionaries in a list,
sending it to GPT.
And before I can finish explaining it, it's come back.
We've got an answer.
Here is a summary of my website.
Our little snapshot of my website about me.
It's a bit hard to see because it's all on one line and it's not so formatted, and we can fix that
quickly by making another function called Display Summary.
It will call that that function.
Here it will call summarize with the given URL.
And then it will use this utility display markdown which is a nice way to show markdown elegantly inside
one of these labs.
So if I run this, then once again it's building the system message, the user message, packaging them
up, calling the chat completions API.
And with what comes back, I have to actually run display summary for my website.
Now it's actually doing that, making a system prompt and user message, sending it off.
And what comes back bam is this website summary.
Uh, this website is the personal and professional homepage of Edward Donner, a coder and AI enthusiast
who enjoys experimenting with large language models.
That sounds like me.
Uh, and, uh, it says Nebula, and it's got some projects.
It's about my interests and some posts and announcements summarized and how to reach me.
Uh, so we've just done it.
We've just built something that's able to take a website, scrape it and summarize it, using a call
to OpenAI running in the cloud, connected to the API key in your EMV file.
Congratulations.
Try it with some different websites, experiment with it and hey, you can go to the system prompt and
mess with that.
How about we get a snarky version of the website instead of the normal version?
Any of these things are possible.
Go and experiment and explore and have fun.
Calling the OpenAI API.
Well, let's have some fun!
Since I mentioned we can change the system prompt, let's go and do that.
Let's go back up to the system prompt here instead of your your helpful assistant.
Let's make this.
You are a snarky assistant that analyzes the contents of a website and provides a short, snarky, humorous
summary.
And then run that.
Let's redefine the system prompt.
Let's just go straight back down and rerun this line here.
To summarize.
Edward Donald, let's do the display version, make it the pretty version of it, run that and run display
summary and see what we get.
Edward Donner's nerdy Playground editor is your friendly neighborhood code monkey who's obsessed with
playing DJ badly.
Stalking Hacker News like it's the only social interaction he needs.
Latest news like you're dying to know so wonderfully.
Just with that tiny change, we've been able to get a snarky version.
Not just a Reader's Digest version, but a snarky version.
And we can also use this to do different kinds of tones and styles and try it with other websites,
too.
And so I'll keep it on snarky mode.
And let's look at what CNN's news of the day is.
Uh, it's now collecting all of CNN's website, the news site, and it's coming, uh, the CNN, the
glorious smorgasbord of everything news.
Welcome to CNN, where you can get your daily dose of global chaos, celebrity heartache breaks and
government shenanigans in one place, trying to escape world wars, hurricanes and political drama.
Too bad it's all here, front and center.
Ha!
So, uh, yeah, because nothing says fun like a political stalemate so wonderfully.
This has given us a summary of the news, but also a snarky version of it as well.
And you can try some different websites here too.
What you'll discover is that this is a pretty simplistic solution.
The way that I'm scraping web pages will only work for web pages that don't get rendered in the client
web web pages, that you can just fetch them remotely and you'll get the full content.
And that doesn't work for too many websites.
But luckily, there's an easy way to build this out yourself if you know about this.
If you know about tools like Selenium or Playwright, then you can build this yourself.
And many students have.
And that brings me to the topic of the community contributions.
So over here in week one is a folder called Community Contributions.
And it's a place where you can put your own projects.
And if I open this up, you'll see that a lot of people have come and done this, which is such a joy.
You can come in here and add in your own exercises and your own examples.
It could be as simple as changing the system prompt to translate a web page to French or Spanish.
Uh, hopefully better than any of my Spanish.
Uh, and you can do anything that you want.
But use this as an opportunity to make changes and to share them with other students.
And there are instructions on how you do that.
In the guides.
There's a guide on the git and GitHub guide includes instructions for how you submit what's called a
PR, a pull request, which lets me merge in your changes into the repo.
And I would love that.
And I'd love it if you shared it.
And it's a great way to add value to the whole community and to get your work seen and get get me to
see it and look at it and comment on it as well.
So, uh, I want to mention that that there are so many business applications of what we've built,
uh, the fact that we've, we've just experienced calling a frontier model in the cloud, and we've
then given it some instructions to summarize it, to change the tone, we could translate it.
There are so many different ways that you could extend this and use it, and you will see many of them
in community contributions.
So many things.
Someone added it to to to call the Yahoo Finance API to summarize stock movements.
There's lots of other stuff in here and you should be inspired by this, but try and take it in your
own direction.
Apply it to your business or to some some personal thing that's been on your mind.
A pain point that you think you can fix.
A simple way that you can make a call that involves collecting a web page and doing something with that
web page.
That's it's such an open canvas.
There's so many different commercial directions that you can take this, this idea of summarization
or translation.
This is one of the most essential and simple gen AI use cases, and you now know how to do it.
And you can apply this to any problem you want.
So please do that, apply it to a different business and try it out for yourself.
Uh, try making something and and have fun with it above all.

011. Day 1 - Hands-On Exercise: Building Your First OpenAI API Call from Scratch (6min)

Transcript:
And now an exercise for you.
You've just hopefully gone in and run this for other web pages, and you've maybe tried tweaking it
for a different business purpose.
The exercise is now to come in here and see if you can make your own message to GPT from scratch.
So first of all, write a simple system prompt.
Now you should think about something completely different to do here, perhaps still related to to summarizing
information.
So as an example, you might want to summarize the contents of an email.
Or perhaps you might want to take an email and come up with a nice subject, a possible subject for
that email that might be an example of a business task.
So in the system prompt here, describe the task that you want it to do in the user prompt.
You'll want to put in here the contents of the email or the thing to be translated or whatever the is
going to be the prompt with the instruction.
Then you now have to do some typing, just like I did some typing.
It's your turn to do some typing.
Replace this messages equals you're going to want to put in here something which will describe your
messages to OpenAI.
So this is going to be a place where you're going to put in a list of dictionaries, two dictionaries.
And it's going to have some things in it like role and content, and cursor is determined to fill it
in for me.
But don't cheat.
Uh, try and see if you can't do it yourself and then cheat if you can't.
Of course, it's always good to use AI tools.
It's not cheating in the least.
And then you have to uncomment this line and have response equals and type in the the the command that
you're going to give, which I'll tell you very quickly, is OpenAI create.
And you pass in the model name and the messages, and then you're going to print the result.
And the result will be this word response .0. content.
And always look back up in this code and copy and paste to get that example.
And when you've done that you should find that that works.
And if you've built something like something that can give you the subject of an email or something
else, then please consider doing a PR.
The instructions are in the in the guide so that I can get to see it myself.
And I can share in your joy of your first commercial call to an LLM.
And then finally, there's this extra exercise I mentioned for people that are pros, people that already
know this stuff.
You'll be aware that, as I say, my my way of web scraping is super simplistic, but you could use
selenium or playwright or something similar to do proper web scraping with a web page that gets rendered
in the browser, and you'll see that other people have done that.
There's a playwright version there.
I know that there's several selenium versions.
You could look at how other students have done it.
But first, if you know this stuff, if you've used selenium or playwright before, have a shot at doing
it yourself as well to build a more industrial strength.
Web page summarizer.
And then afterwards, as I say one more time, please do consider sharing your code.
The guide will tell you how to do it.
Submit a PR.
I will gladly review it and I'd love to include it in the community contributions with 1 or 2 other
people that have done this too.
Okay, so with that, that's your mission.
Enjoy it.
Fill this in.
If if you if you find that you're struggling with it, please don't worry.
We're going to be doing this so many times over the next eight weeks that's going to become second nature.
Give it a shot.
Give it your best crack.
And if you can't get it this time, don't worry.
We'll be coming back to this tomorrow.
Wow.
You're probably thinking, whoa, this if this is if this day is what every day is like, this course
is going to go on forever.
No, today was a big, big day.
And it's longer than most of our days will be.
You've got through a ton of material.
You've made your first request to an LLM, and I'm hoping that you've also adapted it for a different
commercial task.
And maybe you've even submitted a PR.
So much has got done and and it's just just a great start.
Your environment is built and ready for prime time.
And tomorrow we're going to start getting a little bit deeper.
But already, even though your journey just started, your 2.5% of the way along your journey to the
to the path of being 100% a master of LM engineering.
You've already used a llama to run a model locally on your box.
Perhaps several models.
Seems like an age ago that we did that.
But we did that.
You've written code that calls OpenAI's frontier models.
You know the difference between a system prompt and a user prompt.
And you've built summarization.
You know how to apply to commercial problems.
Maybe you've built a couple yourself.
Tomorrow is going to be a little bit of a breather.
It's going to be an easier day, I promise.
We're going to talk about the steps it takes between now and being a master of LM engineering.
I'm going to set you up for success.
We're going to talk through some of the top frontier models out there, and we'll also do a little bit
of a dig into Olama and using Olama locally.
I kind of repeat of that lab, but using Olama locally on on our own computers, people that didn't
want to to get OpenAI.
That's your chance to use Olama instead.
So I'm super excited to see you on day two.
You survived all of day one that by far the biggest day of the whole course.
So tomorrow much gentler.
Can't wait.
See you then.
